Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.080

Admission of veterans—Establishment of requirements if in service.

If an applicant under RCW 2.48.070 through 2.48.110 is, at the time he or she applies for admission to practice law in the state of Washington, still in the armed forces of the United States, he or she may establish the requirements of the proviso in RCW 2.48.070 by a letter or certificate from his or her commanding officer and by the certificates of at least two active members of the Washington state bar association.

[ 2011 c 336 s 63; 1945 c 181 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 138-7B.]